Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 9 RETAIL SALE OF LIQUOR BY THE DRINK
§ 23-939. Separability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or any part of this act, shall be declared and adjudged to be invalid and/or unconstitutional, such invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect, invalidate, or nullify the remainder of this act.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 36, p. 870.

§ 23-940. Alcohol beverage control fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the alcohol beverage control fund. All moneys from license and transfer fees that are collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the alcohol beverage control fund. Expenditures of moneys in the fund shall be subject to legislative appropriation for the use of the Idaho state police alcohol beverage control bureau in carrying out the provisions of title 23, Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated by the director thereunder. At the beginning of each fiscal year, those moneys in the alcohol beverage control fund that exceed two hundred percent (200%) of that fiscal year appropriation, as certified by the state treasurer, shall be transferred to the general fund.

All other moneys collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 37, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 38, p. 811; am. 2012, ch. 160, § 1, p. 435.

§ 23-941. Declaration of public policy.

It is hereby declared that the intent of this act is to restrict persons under the ages herein specified from entering, remaining in or loitering in or about certain places, as herein defined, which are operated and commonly known as taverns, barrooms, taprooms and cocktail lounges and which do not come within the definition of restaurant as herein contained and are not otherwise expressly exempted from the restrictions herein contained.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 1, p. 420.

§ 23-942. Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply in the interpretation of the enforcement of this act:

“Licensee” shall mean any person licensed to sell liquor by the drink at retail pursuant to the provisions of chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, and any person licensed to sell beer for consumption on the premises where sold pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10, title 23, Idaho Code, or county or municipal ordinance.

“Place,” as used in this act, means any room of any premises licensed for the sale of liquor by the drink at retail wherein there is a bar and liquor, bar supplies and equipment are kept and where beverages containing alcoholic liquor are prepared or mixed and served for consumption therein, and any room of any premises licensed for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises wherein there is a bar and beer, bar supplies and equipment are kept and where beer is drawn or poured and served for consumption therein.

“Restaurant,” as used in this act, means any restaurant, cafe, hotel dining room, coffee shop, cafeteria, railroad dining car or other eating establishment having kitchen and cooking facilities for the preparation of food and where hot meals are regularly served to the public.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 2, p. 420.

§ 23-943. Persons under specified ages forbidden to enter, remain in or loiter at certain licensed places.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall enter, remain in or loiter in or about any place, as herein defined, licensed for the sale of liquor by the drink at retail, or sale of beer for consumption on the premises; nor shall any licensee of either such place, or any person in charge thereof, or on duty while employed by the licensee therein, permit or allow any person under the age specified with respect thereto to remain in or loiter in or about such place.

Provided, however, it is lawful for persons who are musicians and singers eighteen (18) years of age or older, to enter and to remain in any place as defined in section 23-942, Idaho Code, but only during and in the course of their employment as musicians and singers. Provided further, that it is lawful for persons who are nineteen (19) years of age or older to sell, serve, possess or dispense liquor, beer or wine in the course of their employment in any place as defined in section 23-942, Idaho Code, or in any other place where liquor, beer or wine are lawfully present, so long as such place is the place of employment for such person under twenty-one (21) years of age. However the foregoing shall not permit the sale or distribution of any alcoholic beverages to any person under the ages specified for sale of alcoholic beverages.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 3, p. 420; am. 1971, ch. 59, § 1, p. 134; am. 1972, ch. 330, § 5, p. 828; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 1, p. 834; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 6, p. 448.

§ 23-943A. Identification.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to refuse to present identification indicating age, when requested by a peace officer of the state of Idaho when: (a) he or she shall possess, purchase, attempt to purchase or consume alcoholic liquor, as defined by section 23-105, Idaho Code; or (b) he or she shall possess, purchase, attempt to purchase or consume beer as defined by section 23-1001, Idaho Code; or (c) he or she is on a premises licensed to sell liquor by the drink at retail, or licensed to sell beer for consumption on the premises.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-943A, as added by 1977, ch. 264, § 1, p. 772.

§ 23-944. Exceptions from restriction on entering or remaining.

It shall not be unlawful for, nor shall section 23-943, Idaho Code, be construed to restrict, any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years from entering or being:

Upon the premises of any restaurant, as herein defined, or in any railroad observation or club car or any airplane of a commercial airline, notwithstanding that such premises may also be licensed for the sale of liquor by the drink or for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises or that alcoholic beverages, or beer, or both, are prepared, mixed or dispensed and served and consumed therein;

In any building, a part or portion of which is used as a place, as herein defined, provided such place is separated or partitioned from the remainder of said building and access to such place through a doorway or doorways or other means of ingress can be controlled to prevent persons under the ages specified with respect thereto in section 23-943, Idaho Code, from entering therein;

In any baseball park, sports arena, convention center, multipurpose arena, plaza, theater that is presenting live performances, or fairgrounds, notwithstanding that such premises or any portion thereof may be licensed for the sale of liquor by the drink, wine or beer for consumption on the premises or that such products are dispensed and served and consumed therein; provided, that the person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is attending a lawful activity, show, exhibition, performance or event on the premises or is required to be present as a condition of his employment. It is lawful for persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years to enter and remain in a baseball park, sports arena, convention center, multipurpose arena, plaza, theater that is presenting live performances, or fairgrounds as long as the activity, show, exhibition, performance or event is lawful and the person does not violate section 23-949, Idaho Code;

Upon the premises of any licensed brewery or winery notwithstanding that such premises or any portion thereof may also be licensed for the sale of beer or wine for consumption on the premises or that beer or wine is dispensed and served and consumed therein;

Upon the licensed premises of a wine retailer, wholly owned and operated by a licensed winery that retails exclusively the products of that winery;

At a location, other than a liquor, beer, or wine licensed premises, authorized to serve alcoholic beverages under a valid alcohol beverage catering permit; or

In any movie theater that is allowed to sell beer or wine for consumption on the premises pursuant to a valid license and which movie theater had a license that was valid and not suspended or revoked on January 1, 2006, or any other theater or movie theater built prior to January 1, 1950, and listed on the national register of historic places. No films, still pictures, electronic reproductions or other visual reproductions that are in violation of chapter 41, title 18, Idaho Code (indecency and obscenity), or are in violation of federal law regarding pornography, indecency or obscenity shall be shown or displayed on the premises. As used in this subsection, “movie theater” means a motion picture theater that is being utilized solely for exhibition of a motion picture.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 4, p. 420; am. 1972, ch. 330, § 6, p. 828; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 2, p. 834; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 7, p. 448; am. 1990, ch. 320, § 1, p. 876; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 5, p. 146; am. 2000, ch. 361, § 1, p. 1198; am. 2003, ch. 111, § 2, p. 348; am. 2006, ch. 378, § 1, p. 1171; am. 2016, ch. 357, § 2, p. 1048; am. 2019, ch. 83, § 2, p. 198; am. 2019, ch. 87, § 1, p. 212; am. 2020, ch. 9, § 1, p. 10.

§ 23-945. Posting signs as to restriction.

Every licensee herein referred to shall keep a sign conspicuously posted over or near each entrance to any place from which persons under twenty-one (21) years are herein restricted giving public notice of such fact. The wording and size of such signs shall be in accordance with such regulations as the director may prescribe.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 5, p. 420; am. 1972, ch. 330, § 7, p. 828; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 3, p. 834; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 39, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 8, p. 448.

§ 23-946. Statement made by licensees of premises operated as restaurants — Indorsement upon license.

Every applicant for a state license for the sale of liquor by the drink or for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises claiming that the premises for which such license is sought constitute and are operated as a restaurant, as herein defined, shall, on each application for state license and on each application for renewal of license, state that such premises constitute and are operated as such restaurant. Upon issuance of state license for the sale of liquor by the drink or for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises, for premises constituting and operated as a restaurant, the licensee of which has made the proper statement on the application, the director shall indorse on the face of the license the fact that it has been issued to a restaurant as herein defined. Unless such statement shall have been filed with the director and his said indorsement shall appear on the face of the license, the restrictions contained in section 23-943, Idaho Code, shall apply, notwithstanding that such premises may in fact constitute and be operated as a restaurant, and the posting of signs as provided for in section 23-945, Idaho Code, shall be required. The filing of any false statement on the application as herein required shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of license. If premises, licensed as a restaurant under this act, subsequently ceases to meet the qualifications of a restaurant, as defined in section 23-942, Idaho Code, the restrictions contained in section 23-943, Idaho Code, shall apply and the posting of signs as provided for in section 23-945, Idaho Code, shall be required. In such event the licensee shall advise the director, by mail, that his premises no longer constitute a restaurant, so that the license may be modified accordingly.

The powers of the director to make, promulgate and publish rules and regulations as set forth in section 23-932, Idaho Code, shall apply to sections 23-941 to 23-946, Idaho Code.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 5, p. 420; am. 1957, ch. 45, § 1, p. 80; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 40, p. 811; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 8, p. 320.

§ 23-947. Violations of act a misdemeanor.

The violation of any of the provisions of this act shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History.

1955, ch. 195, § 7, p. 420.

§ 23-948. Waterfront resorts — Licensing even if outside corporate limits of city.

Nothing contained in section 23-903, Idaho Code, shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a waterfront resort, even if situated outside the incorporated limits of a city. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued under the provisions of this section. For the purpose of this section, a waterfront resort shall comprise real property with not less than two hundred (200) feet of lake frontage upon a lake or reservoir as defined by the army corps of engineers of not less than one hundred sixty (160) acres, or river frontage upon a river with at least an average six (6) months’ flow of eleven thousand (11,000) cubic feet per second, and shall be open to the public, where people assemble for the purpose of vacationing, boating or fishing, and each waterfront resort must have suitable docks or permanent improved boat launching facilities not less than sixteen (16) feet in width on property owned or leased by the resort operator or on property contiguous thereto owned by this state or the federal government open to the public for recreational uses for the purpose of caring for vacationers, or other recreational users and either of the following:

Hotel or motel accommodations for not less than fifty (50) persons, including a full-service restaurant that serves regularly at least two (2) meals per day to the public during a continuous period of at least four (4) months per year; or

A building of not less than three thousand (3,000) square feet of public use floor space, including a full-service restaurant that serves regularly at least two (2) meals per day to the public during a continuous period of at least four (4) months per year and paved or gravelled parking for fifty (50) automobiles on the operator’s owned or leased property and any contiguous property upon which are the docks or boat launching facilities described above.

The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code, unless said resort is located within the corporate limits of a city or village, in which case the license fee shall be the same as for other licensees within such corporate limits.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to interfere with the privileges of the holder of a lake resort license issued under this section prior to the effective date of this section.

Licenses issued pursuant to this section shall remain valid and may be transferred according to the provisions of this chapter even if the lake, reservoir or river on which the waterfront resort is situated ceases to meet the requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-948, as added by 1959, ch. 151, § 1, p. 348; am. 1967, ch. 123, § 1, p. 118; am. 1986, ch. 145, § 1, p. 407; am. 1988, ch. 333, § 1, p. 999; am. 2018, ch. 226, § 1, p. 517.

§ 23-949. Persons not allowed to sell, serve or dispense beer, wine or other alcoholic liquor.

It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to sell, serve or dispense beer, wine or other alcoholic liquor; provided, however, that any person who is nineteen (19) years of age or older may sell, serve and dispense liquor, beer or wine in the course of his employment in any place as defined in section 23-942, Idaho Code, or other place where liquor, beer or wine is lawfully present so long as such place is the place of employment for such person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

For purposes of this section, a person who sells, serves or dispenses liquor, beer or wine in compliance with the provisions of this section shall not be deemed to “possess” alcohol in violation of section 23-604, Idaho Code.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty and punished in accordance with section 18-1502, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-949, as added by 1961, ch. 18, § 1, p. 21; am. 1972, ch. 330, § 8, p. 828; am. 1978, ch. 374, § 1, p. 980; am. 1981, ch. 222, § 4, p. 412; am. 1982, ch. 110, § 5, p. 311; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 9, p. 448; am. 2000, ch. 334, § 1, p. 1125; am. 2016, ch. 344, § 5, p. 987.

§ 23-950. Restriction against transfer of license.

No license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be renewed, transferred, assigned, leased or sold if:

The state tax commission has notified the director and the licensee in writing that any tax imposed by chapters 30 and 36, title 63, Idaho Code, interest, penalty, and additional amount, which has accrued as a result of the operation of the licensed premises has been assessed as that term is defined in section 63-3045A, Idaho Code, against the licensee or any person operating the licensed premises with the permission of the licensee; or

The department of labor has notified the director and the licensee in writing that a lien has been filed against the licensee or any person operating the licensed premises with the permission of the licensee, as a result of the operation of the licensed premises securing amounts due pursuant to chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code.

At such time as the state tax commission or the department of labor has notified the director and licensee as herein provided, the license issued for the premises the operation of which has resulted in the accrual of the tax for which the warrant or lien is outstanding shall be subject to levy and distraint pursuant to chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, or seizure pursuant to section 72-1360A, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-950, as added by 1981, ch. 6, § 1, p. 13; am. 1987, ch. 86, § 6, p. 161; am. 2005, ch. 5, § 1, p. 6; am. 2007, ch. 360, § 12, p. 1061.

§ 23-951. Distilled spirits fuels. — (1) Any person, partnership, association or corporation registered to produce alcohol for use in motor fuels and in possession of a federal operating permit pursuant to title 27, code of federal regulations, part 201.131

201.138 or part 201.64, 201.65 shall not be deemed to be making alcoholic liquor within the meaning of section 23-105, Idaho Code, provided:

Such person, partnership, association or corporation prior to commencing operation furnishes the Idaho state police with a true copy of the operating permit application described in title 27, code of federal regulations, part 201.137 or 201.65 and a true copy of the operating permit or other authorizing document;

Such person, partnership, association or corporation faithfully complies with all security and supervision requirements of the federal government; and

Alcohol possessed or produced under the federal operating permit is not used, sold or made available for human consumption.

(2) The Idaho state police shall maintain a list of persons, partnerships, associations or corporations in the state of Idaho who hold federal operating permits as described in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-950, as added by 1981, ch. 56, § 1, p. 85; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 65, p. 1450.

§ 23-952. Cross-country skiing facility — Licensing even if outside corporate limits of city.

Nothing contained in law shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of an actual cross-country skiing facility if situated five (5) or more miles outside the corporate limits of a city. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall be applicable to licenses issued pursuant to this section. For the purposes of this section, a cross-country skiing facility shall comprise real property, open to the public, with not less than fifteen (15) miles of groomed cross-country skiing trails, and overnight accommodations for not less than twenty (20) persons. The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Not more than one (1) licensed premises shall be permitted on any cross-country skiing facility or within the area comprising the facility.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-952, as added by 1987, ch. 32, § 3, p. 53.

§ 23-953. Racing facilities — Licensing.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a racing facility, even if situated outside the incorporated limits of a city. A “racing facility” means an actual, bona fide racing facility located on not less than twenty (20) contiguous acres with permanently erected seating of not less than one thousand (1,000) capacity, and which has a license to conduct pari-mutuel racing. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued under the provisions of this section. The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Licenses issued under the provisions of this section are not transferable.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-953, as added by 1988, ch. 287, § 1, p. 921.

§ 23-954. Theme parks — Licensing.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a theme park, even if situated outside the incorporated limits of a city. A “theme park” means a facility located on not less than forty (40) contiguous acres, and permanently constructed for the purpose of conducting, presenting or providing activities and services normally related to family oriented entertainment and recreational programs, which is open to the public and which provides meeting facilities. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued under the provisions of this section. The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-954, as added by 1988, ch. 307, § 1, p. 962.

§ 23-955. Split ownership facility — Licensing.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a premises that has been, because of a split in ownership of the original premises, separated from a ski resort facility or golf course already licensed under the provisions of section 23-903, Idaho Code. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall be applicable to licenses issued pursuant to this section. The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Licenses issued under the provisions of this section are not transferable.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-955, as added by 1994, ch. 432, § 1, p. 1396; am. 1995, ch. 145, § 1, p. 612; am. 2004, ch. 259, § 1, p. 734.

§ 23-956. Continuation of golf course liquor license following change of land use.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator, or lessee of a premises previously licensed as a golf course under the provisions of section 23-903, Idaho Code, following termination of the golf course use and conversion of the premises to another use or uses, provided that the golf course was licensed as a golf course under the provisions of section 23-903, Idaho Code, for a minimum of twenty (20) years prior to such termination. The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall be applicable to licenses issued pursuant to this section. The fees for licenses granted under the provisions of this section shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code, unless the premises is located within the incorporated limits of any city, in which case the fee shall be the same as that prescribed for a license in a city of that size as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Licenses issued under the provisions of this section are not transferable away from the premises. Upon termination of the golf course use, no part of the premises shall be eligible for the issuance of an additional license pursuant to section 23-955, Idaho Code, due to a split in ownership which occurs after such termination. The eligibility to obtain a license pursuant to this section following termination of the golf course use shall, in the event of a later split in ownership of the premises, be allocated to one (1) of the parcels resulting from such split, either by contract between the parties to the split or by grant or reservation in the deed of conveyance. In the event the contract between the parties or the deed of conveyance fails to specify which parcel retains eligibility under this section, eligibility shall be deemed to be retained by the parcel upon which is, or was, located the greater share of physical improvements at or within which alcohol was served prior to the split in ownership. Upon any further split of the parcel retaining eligibility to obtain a license pursuant to this section, the same restrictions shall apply to the new split in ownership and any future splits of the parcel retaining such eligibility, such that there shall never be more than one (1) license issued pursuant to this section for the land constituting the original golf course premises. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of any split-off parcel to the extent such parcel qualifies for a license under any other provision of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-956, as added by 2005, ch. 357, § 2, p. 1128.

§ 23-957. Year-round [resort] liquor license.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of not more than twelve (12) licenses to the owner, operator or lessee of beverage, lodging or dining facilities located and operated within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of a year-round resort.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a golf course, ski resort, cross-country skiing facility or waterfront resort, as defined in sections 23-903, 23-903a and 23-948, Idaho Code, located within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of a year-round resort, provided that such license shall count against the maximum number of licenses allowed by subsection (1) of this section.

No license issued to the owner, operator or lessee of beverage, lodging or dining facilities located and operated within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of a year-round resort shall be transferable to another location or facility located outside the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of the year-round resort.

The fees for licenses granted to the owner, operator or lessee of beverage, lodging or dining facilities located and operated within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of a year-round resort shall be the same as those prescribed for year-round resorts in section 23-904(10), Idaho Code.

“Year-round resort” means a resort open to the public year-round that shall have all of the following within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of the resort:

Cross-country skiing on not less than thirty (30) kilometers of groomed cross-country skiing trails;

Alpine skiing on real property of not less than eight hundred fifty (850) acres, operating two (2) or more chairlifts with a vertical lift of two thousand eight hundred (2,800) feet or more, and having operating snowmaking equipment providing coverage to at least seventy-five (75) acres of skiing;

A golf course having:

No less than eighteen (18) holes with greens, fairways and tees laid out in the usual and regular manner of a golf course;

A total distance of seven thousand (7,000) yards as measured by totaling the tee-to-green distance of all holes; and

The course planted in grass;

Mountain bike activities that include at least twelve (12) miles of single-track trails, chairlift-served access to at least two thousand eight hundred (2,800) feet of vertical descent and a full-service bike rental and repair facility; and

At least seventy (70) private residences and accommodations available to provide overnight lodging and dining facilities serving at least two (2) meals per day for at least five hundred (500) persons located within the ownership, boundaries, or leasehold premises of the resort.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-957, as added by 2006, ch. 449, § 2, p. 1333; am. 2008, ch. 178, § 2, p. 530; am. 2019, ch. 88, § 1, p. 216.